Hawaii statutes.
§107-22 State building code council. (a)
There is established a state building code council. The council shall be
placed within the department of accounting and general services for
administrative purposes only. The council shall consist of eleven voting
members and one nonvoting member, who shall be the comptroller or the
comptroller's designee. The council members shall serve four-year terms. The
voting members shall include:

(1) One county building official from each of the
four counties appointed by the mayor;

(2) One member representing the state fire council;

(3) One member representing the department of labor
and industrial relations who has significant experience in elevator safety;

(4) One member representing the state energy office
of the department of business, economic development, and tourism;

(5) One member representing the Structural Engineers
Association of Hawaii;

(6) One member representing the American Institute of
Architects, Hawaii State Council;

(7) One member representing the Building Industry
Association of Hawaii or the General Contractors Association of Hawaii, who has
significant experience with building codes, with alternating four-year terms
between the two organizations and the first four-year term to be served by the
Building Industry Association of Hawaii; and

(8) One member representing the Subcontractors'
Association of Hawaii who has significant experience with building codes.

(b) Seven voting members shall constitute a
quorum. The chairperson of the council shall be elected annually from among
its members by a majority vote of the members of the council.

(c) Members shall serve without compensation,
but shall be reimbursed for expenses, including travel expenses necessary for
the performance of their duties. [L 2007, c 82, pt of §2; am L 2014, c 164, §3]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next